Illinois, session 104th, SB737.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 16-101 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/16-101)7    Sec. 16-101. Short title and applicability. 8    (a) This Article may be cited as the the Electric Service 9Customer Choice and Rate Relief Law of 1997 and shall apply to 10electric utilities and alternative retail electric suppliers 11as defined in this Article. Except to the extent modified or 12supplemented by the provisions of this Article, or where the 13context clearly renders such provisions inapplicable, the 14other Articles of the Public Utilities Act pertaining to 15public utilities, public utility rates and services and the 16regulation thereof, are fully and equally applicable to the 17tariffed services electric utilities provide.18    (b) The provisions of subsections (a) through (h) of 19Section 16-111 of this Act shall not be applicable to any 20electric utility which elects to file biennial rate 21proceedings before the Commission in the years 1998, 2000 and 222002. An electric utility electing this option shall do so by 23filing a notice of such election with the Commission within 60   SB0737- 2 -LRB104 07037 AAS 17074 b1days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1997, 2or its right to make such election shall be irrevocably 3waived. An electric utility electing the option specified in 4this paragraph shall file its rate proceeding with the 5Commission no later than August 1 of the years 1998, 2000, and 62002. The electric utility's filing shall comply with all 7requirements of 83 Illinois Administrative Code Parts 255 and 8285 as though the electric utility were filing for an increase 9in its rates, without regard to whether such filing would 10produce an increase, a decrease or no change in the electric 11utility's rates and the Commission shall review the electric 12utility's filing and shall issue its order in accordance with 13the provisions of Section 9-201 of this Act.14(Source: P.A. 90-561, eff. 12-16-97.)